Utah statutes.
53B-8a-109.   Repayment and ownership of funds in the account -- Transfer of
ownership rights.
(1) (a)  The account owner retains ownership of funds in the account until:
(i)  funds are used to pay higher education costs for the beneficiary;
(ii)  funds are otherwise disbursed;
(iii)  funds are transferred for administrative costs; or
(iv)  the account is closed.
(b) Funds in the account shall be considered to be held in trust for the
benefit of the beneficiary.
(2)  Any amounts that may be paid pursuant to the Utah Educational Savings
Plan Trust that are not listed in this section are owned by the Utah
Educational Savings Plan Trust.
(3) (a)  An account owner may transfer ownership rights to another eligible
person.
(b)  The transfer shall be affected and the property distributed in accordance
with administrative regulations promulgated by the board or the terms of the
account agreement.
